Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6328.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) The secretary of state may issue an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card to an applicant who provides satisfactory proof of the applicant's full legal name, United States citizenship, identity, date of birth, Social Security number, residence address, and a photographic identity document. Beginning June 27, 2021, if the applicant is a program participant in the address confidentiality program under the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.851 to 780.873, the applicant shall present to the secretary of state the applicant's participation card issued under the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.851 to 780.873. An applicant may choose to apply for a standard driver license or standard official state personal identification card or an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card. (2) An enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card must include reasonable security measures to protect against unauthorized disclosure of personal information regarding residents of this state that is contained in the enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card. (3) An enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card may include radio frequency identification technology that is limited to a randomly assigned number that must be encrypted if agreed to by the United States Department of Homeland Security, and does not include biometric data. The secretary of state shall ensure that the radio frequency identification technology is secure from unauthorized data access and includes reasonable security measures to protect against unauthorized disclosure of personal information. An applicant must sign a declaration acknowledging the applicant's understanding of the radio frequency identification technology before the applicant is issued an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card. (4) An enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card that expires on or after March 1, 2020 is considered valid until March 31, 2021. An enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card that expires after March 31, 2021 but before August 1, 2021 is valid until 120 days after the date of the expiration. (4) Beginning January 1, 2027, an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card issued or renewed under this act must include a designation that the applicant is a citizen. The designation must be in a style and format considered appropriate by the secretary of state and must include an image of an eagle. To receive a designation that the individual is a citizen of the United States, the individual shall present satisfactory evidence of citizenship. Satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship includes any of the following documents: (a) The applicant's operator's or chauffeur's license or official state personal identification card issued by this state's department of state or the equivalent department of another state if that department indicates on the applicant's driver license or personal identification card that the individual has provided satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship. (b) The applicant's birth certificate that verifies United States citizenship. The applicant's birth certificate may be accompanied by a marriage license or other documentation that shows a name change. (c) The pertinent pages of the applicant's United States passport identifying the applicant and the applicant's passport number. (d) The applicant's United States naturalization documents or number of the Certificate of Naturalization. (e) The applicant's Certificate of Citizenship. (f) An American Indian Card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security with the classification "KIC". (g) The applicant's Bureau of Indian Affairs card number, Indian Census Number, tribal treaty card number, or tribal enrollment number. (h) The applicant's Certification of Report of Birth or Consular Report of Birth Abroad. (5) The requirements of this act are in addition to the requirements otherwise imposed on individuals who apply for a standard driver license or standard official state personal identification card. (6) The holder of an enhanced driver license issued under this act is subject to every licensing sanction provided under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. As used in this subsection, "licensing sanction" means the restriction, suspension, revocation, or denial of a driver license; the addition of points to a driving record; the assessment of a civil fine or criminal penalty resulting from a conviction; a civil infraction determination; the imposition of probationary terms and conditions; or any other penalty provided under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. (7) Beginning June 27, 2021, upon on receipt of a notice from the department of the attorney general that an individual who has been issued an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card under this act has been certified as a program participant in the address confidentiality program, the secretary of state shall issue a corrected enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card to that individual by mailing the license or card to the individual's designated address. Beginning June 27, 2021, an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card issued under this subsection or subsection (1) to a program participant must display the individual's designated address and must not display the individual's residence address. The requirements of this subsection are in addition to the requirements for individuals who are issued a corrected standard driver license under section 310f of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310f, or a corrected official state personal identification card under section 2a of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.292a. (8) Beginning January 1, 2027, an individual who is a citizen of the United States and has a valid enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card may request, in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary of state, to receive a sticker designating that the individual is a citizen. The sticker must be designed to be placed on an existing enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card, be in a style and format considered appropriate by the secretary of state, and include an image of an eagle. The individual shall present satisfactory proof of citizenship with the individual's request, including at least 1 of the documents listed in subsection (4). (9) (8) As used in this section: (a) "Address confidentiality program" means a program as that term is defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853. (b) "Designated address" means that term as defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853. (c) "Program participant" means that term as defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06501'26) or House Bill No. 6329 (request no. H06501'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06502'26) or House Bill No. 6330 (request no. H06502'26).